tests/утӑ.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах утӑ":
    утӑ<n><nom> :  утӑ 
    утӑ<n><gen> :  уттӑн 
    утӑ<n><dat> :  утта 
    утӑ<n><loc> :  утӑра 
    утӑ<n><abl> :  утӑран 
    утӑ<n><ins> :  утӑпа 
    утӑ<n><abe> :  утӑсӑр 
    утӑ<n><ben> :  утӑшӑн
    утӑ<n><px1sg><nom> :  уттӑм 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><gen> :  уттӑмӑн 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><dat> :  уттӑма 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><loc> :  уттӑмра 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><abl> :  уттӑмран 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><ins> :  уттӑмпа 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><abe> :  уттӑмсӑр 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><ben> :  уттӑмшӑн
    утӑ<n><px2sg><nom> :  утту 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><gen> :  уттун 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><dat> :  уттуна 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><loc> :  уттунта 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><abl> :  уттунтан 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><ins> :  уттупа 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><abe> :  уттусӑр 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><ben> :  уттушӑн
    утӑ<n><px3sp><nom> :  ути 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><gen> :  утин 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><dat> :  утине 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><loc> :  утинче 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><abl> :  утинчен 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><ins> :  утипе 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><abe> :  утисӗр 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><ben> :  утишӗн
    утӑ<n><px1pl><nom> :  уттӑмӑр 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><gen> :  уттӑмӑрӑн 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><dat> :  уттӑмӑра 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><loc> :  уттӑмӑрта 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><abl> :  уттӑмӑртан 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><ins> :  уттӑмӑрпа 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><abe> :  уттӑмӑрсӑр 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><ben> :  уттӑмӑршӑн
    утӑ<n><px2pl><nom> :  уттӑр 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><gen> :  уттӑрӑн 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><dat> :  уттӑра 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><loc> :  уттӑрта 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><abl> :  уттӑртан 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><ins> :  уттӑрпа 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><abe> :  уттӑрсӑр 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><ben> :  уттӑршӑн
    утӑ<n><pl><nom> :  утӑсем 
    утӑ<n><pl><gen> :  утӑсен 
    утӑ<n><pl><dat> :  утӑсене 
    утӑ<n><pl><loc> :  утӑсенче 
    утӑ<n><pl><abl> :  утӑсенчен 
    утӑ<n><pl><ins> :  утӑсемпе 
    утӑ<n><pl><abe> :  утӑсемсӗр 
    утӑ<n><pl><ben> :  утӑсемшӗн
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  уттӑмсем 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  уттӑмсен 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  уттӑмсене 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  уттӑмсенче 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  уттӑмсенчен 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  уттӑмсемпе 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  уттӑмсемсӗр 
    утӑ<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  уттӑмсемшӗн
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  уттусем 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  уттусен 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  уттусене 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  уттусенче 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  уттусенчен 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  уттусемпе 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  уттусемсӗр 
    утӑ<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  уттусемшӗн
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  утисем 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  утисен 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  утисене 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  утисенче 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  утисенчен 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  утисемпе 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  утисемсӗр 
    утӑ<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  утисемшӗн
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  уттӑмӑрсем 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  уттӑмӑрсен 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  уттӑмӑрсене 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  уттӑмӑрсенче 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  уттӑмӑрсенчен 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  уттӑмӑрсемпе 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  уттӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    утӑ<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  уттӑмӑрсемшӗн
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  уттӑрсем 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  уттӑрсен 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  уттӑрсене 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  уттӑрсенче 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  уттӑрсенчен 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  уттӑрсемпе 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  уттӑрсемсӗр 
    утӑ<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  уттӑрсемшӗн
